test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-swimama63_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `sõimama: # Verb (63) `sõimama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     sõimama+V+Inf/mA: sõimama
     sõimama+V+Inf: sõimadaq
     sõimama+V+Act+PrfPrc: sõimanuq
     sõimama+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [sõimat, sõimatu]

     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sõima
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [sõimat, sõimadõq]
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sõimas
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: sõimamiq
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sõimatiq
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sõimasõq
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: sõima
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [sõimssi, sõimassi]
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [sõimssit, sõimssiq, sõimssidõq, sõimassit, sõimassiq, sõimassidõq]
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sõimasʼ
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [sõimssimiq, sõimassimiq]
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [sõimssitiq, sõimassitiq]
     sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [puhksiq, puhksivaq, puhassiq, puhassivaq]]

     sõimama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sõimada
     sõimama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sõimatas

     sõimama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: sõimav

     sõimama+V+Jus: sõimakuq
